Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202544-1530
Appeals.

(1) Any insurer, health insurance lead generator, or person subject to an order of the director under section 44-1529 or 44-1532 may appeal the order. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(2) An order issued by the director under section 44-1529 shall become final:

(a) Upon the expiration of the time allowed for filing a petition for review if no such petition has been duly filed, except that the director may modify or set aside the order; or

(b) Upon the final decision of the court if the court directs that the order of the director be affirmed or the petition for review dismissed.

(3) No order of the director under the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act or order of a court shall in any way relieve or absolve a person affected by such order from liability under any other laws of this state.

Laws 1973, LB 349, § 9;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 60;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB326, § 7.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.